West Virginia, session 2025, HB2905.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 29. MISCELLANEOUS BOARDS AND OFFICERS. ARTICLE 3A. AUTHORITY OF LOCAL FIRE DEPARTMENTS. §29-3A-4. Person attacking or hindering or obstructing firefighter or emergency equipment; penalties. (a) It is unlawful, while any fire department or company or firefighter is lawfully exercising or discharging the department's, company's or firefighter's official duty during an emergency, for any person to:(1) Attack any firefighter or any of his or her equipment with any deadly weapon as defined in §61-7-2 of this code; or(2) Intentionally hinder, obstruct, oppose, or attempt to hinder, obstruct or oppose, or counsel, advise or invite others to hinder, obstruct or oppose, any fire department, fire company or firefighter.(b) Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in a state correctional facility not less than one nor more than 10 years, or, in the discretion of the court, be confined in the regional or county jail not more than one year two years or fined not more than $500 $1,000, or both.(c) Any person willfully violating any of the provisions of section one or three of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $100 $200 nor more than $500 $1,000.(d) Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent law-enforcement officials from controlling traffic and otherwise maintaining order at the scene of a fire.(e) No person may willfully fail or refuse to comply with a lawful order or direction of any fire department or company or firefighter who is lawfully exercising or discharging the department's, company's or firefighter's official duty during an emergency, relating to directing, controlling or regulating traffic, so long as such order or direction is conveyed by a retro-reflective hand signing device. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof: (1) For a first offense shall be fined not more than $100 $200; (2) for a second offense occurring within one year of a previous conviction shall be fined not more than $200 $400; and (3) for a third and subsequent offense shall be fined not more than $500 $1,000. CHAPTER 61. CRIMES AND THEIR PUNISHMENT. ARTICLE 2. CRIMES AGAINST THE PERSON. §61-2-10b. Malicious assault; unlawful assault; battery; and assault on governmental representatives, health care providers, utility workers, law-enforcement officers, correctional employees and emergency medical service personnel; definitions; penalties. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) "Government representative" means any officer or employee of the state or a political subdivision thereof, or a person under contract with a state agency or political subdivision thereof.(2) "Health care worker" means any nurse, nurse practitioner, physician, physician assistant or technician practicing at, and all persons employed by or under contract to a hospital, county or district health department, long-term care facility, physician’s office, clinic or outpatient treatment facility.(3) "Emergency service personnel" means any paid or volunteer firefighter, emergency medical technician, paramedic, or other emergency services personnel employed by or under contract with an emergency medical service provider or a state agency or political subdivision thereof.(4) "Utility worker" means any individual employed by a public utility or electric cooperative or under contract to a public utility, electric cooperative or interstate pipeline.(5) "Law-enforcement officer" has the same definition as this term is defined in W.Va. Code §30-29-1, except for purposes of this section, "law-enforcement officer" shall additionally include those individuals defined as "chief executive" in W.Va. Code §30-29-1.(6) "Correctional employee" means any individual employed by the West Virginia Division of Corrections, the West Virginia Regional Jail Authority, and the West Virginia Division of Juvenile Services and an employee of an entity providing services to incarcerated, detained or housed persons pursuant to a contract with such agencies.(b) Malicious assault. — Any person who maliciously shoots, stabs, cuts or wounds or by any means causes bodily injury with intent to maim, disfigure, disable or kill a government representative, health care worker, utility worker, emergency service personnel, correctional employee or law-enforcement officer acting in his or her official capacity, and the person committing the malicious assault knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in a correctional facility for not less than three six nor more than fifteen 30 years.(c) Unlawful assault. — Any person who unlawfully but not maliciously shoots, stabs, cuts or wounds or by any means causes a government representative, health care worker, utility worker, emergency service personnel, correctional employee or law-enforcement officer acting in his or her official capacity bodily injury with intent to maim, disfigure, disable or kill him or her and the person committing the unlawful assault knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in a correctional facility for not less than two four nor more than five 10 years.(d) Battery. — Any person who unlawfully, knowingly and intentionally makes physical contact of an insulting or provoking nature with a government representative, health care worker, utility worker, emergency service personnel, correctional employee or law-enforcement officer acting in his or her official capacity and the person committing the battery knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity, or unlawfully and intentionally causes physical harm to that person acting in such capacity and the person committing the battery knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $500 $1,000 or confined in jail not less than one two months nor more than twelve 24 months or both fined and confined. If any person commits a second such offense, he or she is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $1,000 $2,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not less than one year two years nor more than three six years, or both fined and imprisoned. Any person who commits a third violation of this subsection is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $2,000 $4,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not less than two four years nor more than five 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned.(e) Assault. — Any person who unlawfully attempts to commit a violent injury to the person of a government representative, health care worker, utility worker, emergency service personnel, correctional employee or law-enforcement officer, acting in his or her official capacity and the person committing the battery knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity, or unlawfully commits an act which places that person acting in his or her official capacity in reasonable apprehension of immediately receiving a violent injury and the person committing the battery knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in jail for not less than twenty-four 48 hours nor more than six months one year, fined not more than $200 $400, or both fined and confined. (f) Any person convicted of any crime set forth in this section who is incarcerated in a facility operated by the West Virginia Division of Corrections or the West Virginia Regional Jail Authority, or is in the custody of the Division of Juvenile Services and is at least eighteen years of age or subject to prosecution as an adult, at the time of committing the offense and whose victim is a correctional employee may not be sentenced in a manner by which the sentence would run concurrent with any other sentence being served at the time the offense giving rise to the conviction of a crime set forth in this section was committed.